apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="tjál/let__V">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edijn</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="ConNeg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lon</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="Du1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="Du2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liska</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="Du3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="Sg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lis</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="Sg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lop</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="Pl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lit</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="Pl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lisa</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Imprt"/><s n="Pl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lun</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="ImprtII"/><s n="Du1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>luda</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="ImprtII"/><s n="Du2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>luska</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="ImprtII"/><s n="Du3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lu</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="ImprtII"/><s n="Sg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lus</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="ImprtII"/><s n="Sg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lup</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="ImprtII"/><s n="Pl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lut</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="ImprtII"/><s n="Pl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusa</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="ImprtII"/><s n="Pl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="ConNeg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lin</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Du1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lebihtte</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Du2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leba</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Du3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áv</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Sg1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Sg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lá</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Sg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lep</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Pl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lebihtit</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Pl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prs"/><s n="Pl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijma</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Du1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijda</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Du2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijga</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Du3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liv</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Sg1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Sg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ij</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Sg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijma</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Pl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijda</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Pl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lin</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Ind"/><s n="Prt"/><s n="Pl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lám</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="PrfPrc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>átjit</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="Sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>let<s n="V"/><s n="VAbess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Adverbs -->
    <pardef n="ájn__ADV">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ADV"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="tjállet"><i>tjál</i><par n="tjál/let__V"/></e>
    <e lm="agálattjat"><i>agálattjat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gåjt"><i>gåjt</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dåssju"><i>dåssju</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="aktan"><i>aktan</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dalánagi"><i>dalánagi</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="aktij"><i>aktij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="almma"><i>almma</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="almmaláhkáj"><i>almmaláhkáj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="allelattja"><i>allelattja</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="allen"><i>allen</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="assát"><i>assát</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="badjelij"><i>badjelij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="badjen"><i>badjen</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="bajebuttja"><i>bajebuttja</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="biejvvet"><i>biejvvet</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="boahtteájgge"><i>boahtteájgge</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="buorebut"><i>buorebut</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="bájkálattjat"><i>bájkálattjat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="báldas"><i>báldas</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dakkavide"><i>dakkavide</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dalle"><i>dalle</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><i>dan</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dassátjij"><i>dassátjij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="davebuj"><i>davebuj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="davvelij"><i>davvelij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="davás"><i>davás</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dievva"><i>dievva</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="doarrás"><i>doarrás</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dåbbel"><i>dåbbel</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dåhkålattjat"><i>dåhkålattjat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dåppe"><i>dåppe</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dåvlle"><i>dåvlle</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="duobbel"><i>duobbel</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="duoppe"><i>duoppe</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="duodaj"><i>duodaj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="duodas"><i>duodas</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dábbelij"><i>dábbelij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dál"><i>dál</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dálle"><i>dálle</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dáppe"><i>dáppe</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dáppet"><i>dáppet</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="álu"><i>álu</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="ienep"><i>ienep</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dabdá"><i>dabdá</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="ájnnasit"><i>ájnnasit</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="fámulattjat"><i>fámulattjat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="fávdda"><i>fávdda</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gasskat"><i>gasskat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="giesskat"><i>giesskat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gitta"><i>gitta</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="goabbelijge"><i>goabbelijge</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gåjtge"><i>gåjtge</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gåkte"><i>gåkte</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gåktes"><i>gåktes</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gåppus"><i>gåppus</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gåsste"><i>gåsste</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gåsstege"><i>gåsstege</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="guhkebuj"><i>guhkebuj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="guhket"><i>guhket</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="guhkket"><i>guhkket</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="guoktel"><i>guoktel</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="guovddelij"><i>guovddelij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="guovtá"><i>guovtá</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="hálvva"><i>hálvva</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="ilá"><i>ilá</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="jasska"><i>jasska</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="jur"><i>jur</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="jámás"><i>jámás</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="lagábut"><i>lagábut</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="lijká"><i>lijká</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="luksa"><i>luksa</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="lulebuj"><i>lulebuj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="lullelij"><i>lullelij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="luojkas"><i>luojkas</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="lávgga"><i>lávgga</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="aj"><i>aj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="manen"><i>manen</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="maŋemus"><i>maŋemus</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="maŋus"><i>maŋus</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="maŋŋelij"><i>maŋŋelij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="miehtelij"><i>miehtelij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="miedás"><i>miedás</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gåktu"><i>gåktu</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="ietján"><i>ietján</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="naga"><i>naga</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="njoatsebut"><i>njoatsebut</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="njuolgga"><i>njuolgga</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="njálmálattjat"><i>njálmálattjat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="nuorttal"><i>nuorttal</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="nuorttalij"><i>nuorttalij</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="nuppus"><i>nuppus</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="oabmet"><i>oabmet</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="oarjebus"><i>oarjebus</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="tjoahkkáj"><i>tjoahkkáj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="dagu"><i>dagu</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="åvddån"><i>åvddån</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="avtajienalattjat"><i>avtajienalattjat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="ruvva"><i>ruvva</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="sæmmi"><i>sæmmi</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="sisste"><i>sisste</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="bájkoj"><i>bájkoj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="uhtset"><i>uhtset</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="vahkkusattjat"><i>vahkkusattjat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="vehi"><i>vehi</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="viehka"><i>viehka</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="vuolebuj"><i>vuolebuj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="vuollel"><i>vuollel</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="vuollen"><i>vuollen</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="vuosstáj"><i>vuosstáj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="ájggá"><i>ájggá</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="árrat"><i>árrat</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="tjoahkkáj"><i>tjoahkkáj</i><par n="ájn__ADV"/></e>
